Missouri, session 2026, SB1281.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 650.120, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 650.120,
to read as follows:
650.120. 1. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Cyber Crime Investigation Fund". The
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund and may approve
disbursements from the fund in accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180. The department of public safety shall be
the administrator of the fund. Moneys in the fund shall be
used solely for the administration of the grant program
established under this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner
as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
2. The department of public safety shall create a
program to distribute grants to multijurisdictional internet
cyber crime law enforcement task forces, multijurisdictional
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1281 2
enforcement groups, as defined in section 650.153, that are
investigating internet sex crimes against children, and
other law enforcement agencies. The program shall be funded
by the cyber crime investigation fund created under
subsection 1 of this section. Not more than three percent
of the money in the fund may be used by the department to
pay the administrative costs of the grant program. The
grants shall be awarded and used to pay the salaries of
detectives and computer forensic personnel whose focus is
investigating internet sex crimes against children,
including but not limited to enticement of a child,
possession or promotion of child pornography, provide
funding for the training of law enforcement personnel and
prosecuting and circuit attorneys as well as their assistant
prosecuting and circuit attorneys, and purchase necessary
equipment, supplies, and services. The funding for such
training may be used to cover the travel expenses of those
persons participating.
3. A panel is hereby established in the department of
public safety to award grants under this program and shall
be comprised of the following members:
(1) The director of the department of public safety,
or his or her designee;
(2) Two members appointed by the director of the
department of public safety from a list of six nominees
submitted by the Missouri Police Chiefs Association;
(3) Two members appointed by the director of the
department of public safety from a list of six nominees
submitted by the Missouri Sheriffs' Association;
(4) Two members of the state highway patrol appointed
by the director of the department of public safety from a

SB 1281 3
list of six nominees submitted by the Missouri State
Troopers Association;
(5) One member of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(6) One member of the senate appointed by the
president pro tem.
The panel members who are appointed under subdivisions (2),
(3), and (4) of this subsection shall serve a four-year term
ending four years from the date of expiration of the term
for which his or her predecessor was appointed. However, a
person appointed to fill a vacancy prior to the expiration
of such a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the
term. Such members shall hold office for the term of his or
her appointment and until a successor is appointed. The
members of the panel shall receive no additional
compensation but shall be eligible for reimbursement for
mileage directly related to the performance of panel duties.
4. Local matching amounts, which may include new or
existing funds or in-kind resources including but not
limited to equipment or personnel, are required for
multijurisdictional internet cyber crime law enforcement
task forces and other law enforcement agencies to receive
grants awarded by the panel. Such amounts shall be
determined by the state appropriations process or by the
panel.
5. When awarding grants, priority should be given to
newly hired detectives and computer forensic personnel.
6. The panel shall establish minimum training
standards for detectives and computer forensic personnel
participating in the grant program established in subsection
2 of this section.

SB 1281 4
7. Multijurisdictional internet cyber crime law
enforcement task forces and other law enforcement agencies
participating in the grant program established in subsection
2 of this section shall share information and cooperate with
the highway patrol and with existing internet crimes against
children task force programs.
8. The panel may make recommendations to the general
assembly regarding the need for additional resources or
appropriations.
9. The power of arrest of any peace officer who is
duly authorized as a member of a multijurisdictional
internet cyber crime law enforcement task force shall only
be exercised during the time such peace officer is an active
member of such task force and only within the scope of the
investigation on which the task force is working.
Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary,
such task force officer shall have the power of arrest, as
limited in this subsection, anywhere in the state and shall
provide prior notification to the chief of police of a
municipality or the sheriff of the county in which the
100 arrest is to take place. If exigent circumstances exist,
101 such arrest may be made and notification shall be made to
102 the chief of police or sheriff as appropriate and as soon as
103 practical. The chief of police or sheriff may elect to work
104 with the multijurisdictional internet cyber crime law
105 enforcement task force at his or her option when such task
106 force is operating within the jurisdiction of such chief of
107 police or sheriff.
108 [10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
109 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under
110 this section shall be reauthorized on August 28, 2014, and

SB 1281 5
111 shall expire on December 31, 2024, unless reauthorized by an
112 act of the general assembly; and
113 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program
114 authorized under this section shall sunset automatically
115 twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization
116 of this section; and
117 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of
118 the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
119 which the program authorized under this section is sunset.]
✓